fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON kinw-
kinw-/:kinw/ -[t]êskan- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -ask2- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -askitê "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -asâk- "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -asâkay "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -cihc- "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -cihciy- "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -cihcân "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -h "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -hkoT "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -hkot "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -hkw- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -ht2 "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -htawak- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -i1 "weight: 25.272875" ; ! n=3/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -ihtak- "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -ikwan- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -isi "weight: 18.309104" ; ! n=6/86 [7/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -iwot- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -iyaw- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kam- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kamâ "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kas- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kaskw- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kot- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/86 [1/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kwayaw- "weight: 25.272875" ; ! n=3/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kâpawi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/86 [1/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -kât- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/86 [1/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -motay- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -paýi "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -paýihtâ "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -piskwan- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -piton- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -sit- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -skiwan- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -tahtahkwan- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -â1 "weight: 17.857119" ; ! n=3/86 [22/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âniskw- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/86 [2/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âpisk- "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âpit- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âpêk- "weight: 16.537386" ; ! n=13/86 [19/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âskw- "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/86 [3/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âwikan- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -âýow- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/86 [1/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -ê1 "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -êk- "weight: 25.678340" ; ! n=2/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -êstaw- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ -ýiýîkicihc- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]
kinw-/:kinw/ ýiýîk- "weight: 26.371487" ; ! n=1/86 [0/145429]

LEXICON kinwâpêk-
kinwâpêk-/:kinwâpêk/ -asâkay "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON kinêpikw-
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -asakay- "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -is "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/13 [1/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -isis "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -isk- "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -iskâ "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -min "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ -ê2 "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-+Der/N:kinêpikw NA "weight: 17.063167" ; ! n=2/13 (NA-3) [73/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ iw "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ iýin- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=1/13 [6/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ iýiniw- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=1/13 [6/145429]
kinêpikw-/:kinêpikw/ ocêpihkw- "weight: 25.960191" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]

LEXICON kip-
kip-/:kip/ -ah1 "weight: 15.170509" ; ! n=19/98 [51/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -ahw1 "weight: 15.014150" ; ! n=11/98 [103/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -atah "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/98 [1/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -atâ- "weight: 19.338724" ; ! n=5/98 [3/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -atâht "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/98 [2/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -atâmo1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/98 [1/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -ht1 "weight: 24.074179" ; ! n=3/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -htawak- "weight: 24.074179" ; ! n=3/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -htin1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/98 [1/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -i3 "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -ihtak- "weight: 23.381032" ; ! n=6/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -isi "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -iskwâht- "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -iskwâhtaw- "weight: 23.563354" ; ! n=5/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -kâpawi "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -n1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=4/98 [1/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -paýi "weight: 24.479644" ; ! n=2/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -paýiho "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -paýin "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -pit "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -sin1 "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -sk1 "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/98 [2/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -skaw1 "weight: 18.383212" ; ! n=3/98 [13/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -tôn- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/98 [1/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -âpisk- "weight: 23.563354" ; ! n=5/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -âpâw- "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -âskw- "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -êýi- "weight: 24.479644" ; ! n=2/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ -êýiht "weight: 24.479644" ; ! n=2/98 [0/145429]
kip-/:kip/ ap- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/98 [3/145429]
kip-/:kip/ api- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/98 [3/145429]
kip-/:kip/ ast- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/98 [2/145429]
kip-/:kip/ astê- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/98 [1/145429]
kip-/:kip/ wêp- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/98 [1/145429]

LEXICON kipihk-
kipihk-/:kipihk/ -ton- "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=4/4 [3/145429]

LEXICON kipiht-
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -h "weight: 26.255655" ; ! n=2/20 [0/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -ht2 "weight: 26.255655" ; ! n=2/20 [0/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -kâpawi "weight: 26.948803" ; ! n=1/20 [0/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -m1 "weight: 26.255655" ; ! n=2/20 [0/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -n1 "weight: 17.952429" ; ! n=3/20 [20/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -owê "weight: 19.156402" ; ! n=3/20 [6/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -paýi "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/20 [1/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -î1 "weight: 19.744189" ; ! n=2/20 [5/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -ýow- "weight: 26.948803" ; ! n=1/20 [0/145429]
kipiht-/:kipiht/ -ýowê "weight: 26.948803" ; ! n=1/20 [0/145429]

LEXICON kipistanê-
kipistanê-/:kipistanê/ -ahw1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
kipistanê-/:kipistanê/ -n1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
kipistanê-/:kipistanê/ -win "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
@R.class.AI@kipistanê-+Der/V:@R.class.AI@kipistanê VAI-ae "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 (VAI-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON kipoc-
kipoc-/:kipoc/ -ihk- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
kipoc-/:kipoc/ -ihkân "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 kinw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=77/27654 [56/145429]
0 kinêpikw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=9/27654 [52/145429]
0 kip- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=76/27654 [181/145429]
0 kipihk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=4/27654 [3/145429]
0 kipiht- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=19/27654 [32/145429]
0 kipistanê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [0/145429]
0 kipoc- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
LEXICON o2-
o2-/:o/ kinw- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/392 [1/145429]
o2-/:o/ kip- "weight: 22.675615" ; ! n=2/392 [0/145429]
